src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_HIIRI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 24 front
!!€ hiiri: hiiri+N+Sg+Nom # mouse
!!€ hiiressä: hiiri+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ hiirtä: hiiri+N+Sg+Par
!!€ hiirten: hiiri+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ hiirien: hiiri+N+Pl+Gen
0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!! It is noteworthy of the official dictionary classification, that classes
!! with numbers 24 and 26 are identical. The distinction should probably not
!! be retained in future versions.

LEXICON N_KAARI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 26 back
!!€ kaari: kaari+N+Sg+Nom # arc
0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_MIELI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 24 front
!!€ mieli: mieli+N+Sg+Nom # mind
0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!! The -mi stems will rarely undego m:n variation for consonant stem forms.

LEXICON N_TAIMI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 25 back
!!€ luomi: luomi+N+Sg+Nom # mole
!!€ luomea: luomi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ luonta: luomi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ luomien: luomi+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ luonten: luomi+N+Pl+Gen
0:mi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:m N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:n N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:me    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:me N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:m N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:n N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:m N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LIEMI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 25 front
!!€ liemi: liemi+N+Sg+Nom # sauce
!!€ liemeä: liemi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ lientä: liemi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ liemien: liemi+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ lienten: liemi+N+Pl+Gen
0:mi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:m N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:n N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:me    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ;
0:me N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:m N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:n N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:m N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!! The -si words that originate from old -te stems have the consonant
!! gradation patterns left in their stems. The si is only in nominative stem
!! and this class mainly concerns stems that are old enough to have undergone
!! ti>si transformation. 

LEXICON N_KAUSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 back
!!€ kausi: kausi+N+Sg+Nom # term
!!€ kautena: kausi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kaudessa: kausi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kautta: kausi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kausina: kausi+N+Pl+Ess
0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KÖYSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 front
!!€ köysi: köysi+N+Sg+Nom # rope
!!€ köytenä: köysi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ köydessä: köysi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ köyttä: köysi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ köysinä: köysi+N+Pl+Ess
0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PONSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 back t~n
!!€ ponsi: ponsi+N+Sg+Nom # straw
!!€ pontena: ponsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ ponnessa: ponsi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ pontta: ponsi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ ponsina: ponsi+N+Pl+Ess
0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ne N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_LÄNSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 front t~n
!!€ kynsi: kynsi+N+Sg+Nom # nail
!!€ kyntenä: kynsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kynnessä: kynsi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kynttä: kynsi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kynsiin: kynsi+N+Pl+Ill
0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ne N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VARSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 back t~r
!!€ varsi: varsi+N+Sg+Nom # stem
!!€ vartena: varsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ varressa: varsi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ vartta: varsi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ varsiin: varsi+N+Pl+Ill
0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:re N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:re   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VIRSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 front t~r
!!€ hirsi: hirsi+N+Sg+Nom # timber
!!€ hirtenä: hirsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ hirressä: hirsi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ hirttä: hirsi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ hirsiin: hirsi+N+Pl+Ill
0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:re N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:re   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_JÄLSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 front t~l
!!€ jälsi: jälsi+N+Sg+Nom # bark
!!€ jältenä: jälsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ jällessä: jälsi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ jälttä: jälsi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ jälsiin: jälsi+N+Pl+Ill
0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:le N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:le   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

!! A few -psi, -ksi, -tsi stems have consonant simplification for
!! consonant stems. Other variation with these stems is the selection of
!! plural genitive allomorphs.

LEXICON N_LAPSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 27 psi
!!€ lapsi: lapsi+N+Sg+Nom # child
!!€ lapsena: lapsi+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ lasta: lapsi+N+Sg+Par
0:psi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pse N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ps N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:pse N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ps N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ps N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ps N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:psi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pse   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ps   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON  N
ankkurinkynsi+N:ankkurin#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
antrasiittihiili+N:antrasiitti#hiil    N_HIIRI  ;
autokansi+N:auto#kan N_PONSI  ;
avainlapsi+N:avain#la   N_LAPSI  ;
elinvuosi+N:elin#vuo   N_KAUSI  ;
elohiiri+N:elo#hiir    N_HIIRI  ;
ersän% kieli+N:ersän% kiel    N_MIELI  ;
etelätuuli+N:etelä#tuul    N_KAARI  ;
hallintotoimi+N:hallinto#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
harjahirsi+N:harja#hir N_VIRSI  ;
hiilikausi+N:hiili#kau   N_KAUSI  ;
hiiriniittyhyppyhiiri+N:hiiriniittyhyppy#hiir    N_HIIRI  ;
hiisi+N:hii    N_KÖYSI  ;
hirsi+N:hir N_VIRSI  ;
hoitolapsi+N:hoito#la   N_LAPSI  ;
hälytysääni+N:hälytys#ään    N_MIELI  ;
häränhäntäliemi+N:härän#häntä#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
ihmismeri+N:ihmis#mer    N_HIIRI  ;
iloliemi+N:ilo#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
imusuoni+N:imu#suon    N_KAARI  ;
itkuvirsi+N:itku#vir N_VIRSI  ;
jalasorsi+N:jalas#or N_VARSI  ;
julkaisuvuosi+N:julkaisu#vuo   N_KAUSI  ;
jälsi+N:jäl N_JÄLSI  ;
jäävesi+N:jää#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
kaalintaimi+N:kaalin#tai   N_TAIMI  ;
kaksoslapsi+N:kaksos#la   N_LAPSI  ;
kalaliemi+N:kala#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
kanaliemi+N:kana#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
kangaskansi+N:kangas#kan N_PONSI  ;
kantasieni+N:kanta#sien    N_MIELI  ;
kapillaarisuoni+N:kapillaari#suon    N_KAARI  ;
keisarikausi+N:keisari#kau   N_KAUSI  ;
keitinliemi+N:keitin#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
kengänvarsi+N:kengän#var N_VARSI  ;
kerjäläislapsi+N:kerjäläis#la   N_LAPSI  ;
kierrekansi+N:kierre#kan N_PONSI  ;
kiitosvirsi+N:kiitos#vir N_VIRSI  ;
kiniinivesi+N:kiniini#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
koivuniemi+N:koivu#nie    N_LIEMI  ;
kokoveri+N:koko#ver    N_MIELI  ;
kotihiiri+N:koti#hiir    N_HIIRI  ;
kukkaslapsi+N:kukkas#la   N_LAPSI  ;
kultasuoni+N:kulta#suon    N_KAARI  ;
kurkihirsi+N:kurki#hir N_VIRSI  ;
kylvötaimi+N:kylvö#tai   N_TAIMI  ;
kynsi+N:kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
kyynäsvarsi+N:kyynäsvar N_VARSI  ;
kääpäsieni+N:kääpä#sien    N_MIELI  ;
lapsi+N:la   N_LAPSI  ;
lapsivesi+N:lapsi#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
lasikansi+N:lasi#kan N_PONSI  ;
laskukausi+N:lasku#kau   N_KAUSI  ;
leijonankynsi+N:leijonan#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
liekkimeri+N:liekki#mer    N_HIIRI  ;
lihaliemi+N:liha#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
lisäjuuri+N:lisä#juur    N_KAARI  ;
loppuponsi+N:loppu#pon N_PONSI  ;
luovutustoimi+N:luovutus#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
lusikanvarsi+N:lusikan#var N_VARSI  ;
länsi+N:län N_LÄNSI  ;
maannousemasieni+N:maan#nousema#sien    N_MIELI  ;
metelivesi+N:meteli#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
ministerikausi+N:ministeri#kau   N_KAUSI  ;
moukarinkaari+N:moukarin#kaar    N_KAARI  ;
mäntyhirsi+N:mänty#hir N_VIRSI  ;
nenänvarsi+N:nenän#var N_VARSI  ;
niemi+N:nie    N_LIEMI  ;
norjan% kieli+N:norjan% kiel    N_MIELI  ;
oikeustoimi+N:oikeus#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
ongelmalapsi+N:ongelmala   N_LAPSI  ;
orsi+N:or N_VARSI  ;
osterinkuori+N:osterin#kuor    N_KAARI  ;
padankansi+N:padan#kan N_PONSI  ;
paistoliemi+N:paisto#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
pallohiili+N:pallo#hiil    N_HIIRI  ;
palotoimi+N:palo#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
partavesi+N:parta#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
pavunvarsi+N:pavun#var N_VARSI  ;
peukalonkynsi+N:peukalon#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
plioseenikausi+N:plioseenikau   N_KAUSI  ;
poranvarsi+N:poran#var N_VARSI  ;
presidentintoimi+N:presidentin#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
puhekieli+N:puhe#kiel    N_MIELI  ;
pumpulipeurahiiri+N:pumpulipeura#hiir    N_HIIRI  ;
puolikaari+N:puoli#kaar    N_KAARI  ;
pystyhirsi+N:pysty#hir N_VIRSI  ;
päivähoitolapsi+N:päivä#hoito#la   N_LAPSI  ;
pääkansi+N:pää#kan N_PONSI  ;
raakavesi+N:raaka#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
rahatoimi+N:raha#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
ruskohiili+N:rusko#hiil    N_HIIRI  ;
ruumakansi+N:ruuma#kan N_PONSI  ;
rönsyvarsi+N:rönsy#var N_VARSI  ;
saarnavirsi+N:saarna#vir N_VIRSI  ;
sokerijuuri+N:sokeri#juur    N_KAARI  ;
sokerivesi+N:sokeri#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
sormenkynsi+N:sormen#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
sotatoimi+N:sota#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
sotavuosi+N:sota#vuo   N_KAUSI  ;
suolaliemi+N:suola#lie    N_LIEMI  ;
suvivirsi+N:suvi#vir N_VIRSI  ;
sydänveri+N:sydän#ver    N_MIELI  ;
sylilapsi+N:syli#la   N_LAPSI  ;
sylinterinkansi+N:sylinterin#kan N_PONSI  ;
tekokynsi+N:teko#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
tienvarsi+N:tien#var N_VARSI  ;
tiskivesi+N:tiski#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
tähtiaikakuukausi+N:tähtiaika#kuukau   N_KAUSI  ;
vaivaishiiri+N:vaivais#hiir    N_HIIRI  ;
valeoikeustoimi+N:vale#oikeus#toi   N_TAIMI  ;
valkosipulinkynsi+N:valko#sipulin#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
varjopuoli+N:varjo#puol    N_KAARI  ;
varpaankynsi+N:varpaan#kyn N_LÄNSI  ;
varpekansi+N:varpekan N_PONSI  ;
vipuvarsi+N:vipu#var N_VARSI  ;
virastokieli+N:virasto#kiel    N_MIELI  ;
virsi+N:vir N_VIRSI  ;
vuorovuosi+N:vuoro#vuo   N_KAUSI  ;
välivesi+N:väli#ve    N_KÖYSI  ;
